District of Columbia statutes.
38-175

Transfers; continuation.

(a)

All functions, authority, programs, positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the Board of Education, as the local education agency, established pursuant to § 1-204.95 [repealed] for the purpose of providing educational services to residents of the District of Columbia are transferred to the Mayor.

(b)

All rules, orders, obligations, determinations, grants, contracts, licenses, and agreements of the Board of Education and the District of Columbia Public Schools transferred to the Mayor under subsection (a) of this section shall continue in effect according to their terms until lawfully amended, repealed, or modified.

History

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 106, 54 DCR 4102